converters/o2t.xfst
        .o. %<Adj%> -> %<Adv%> || .#. {hayli} _
        .o. %<Adj%> -> %<Det%:def%:qst%> || .#. {hangi} _
        .o. %<Adj%> -> %<Det%:indef%> || .#.  {herhangi}|{şöyle}|{bazı}|{çok}|{birtakım}|{bunca} _
        .o. %<N%> -> %<Det%:indef%> || .#. {pekçok} _
        .o. ğ u %<Adj%> -> k %<Det%:indef%> %<p3p%> %<Prn%> || .#. {ço}|{birço} _
        .o. %<N%> -> %<Prn%:pers%:3p%> || .#. {herkes} _
        .o. %<N%> -> %<Prn%> || .#. {birşey}|{kimse}|{herşey} _
        .o. %<N%> -> %<Prn%:locp%> || .#. {bura}|{ora} _

        .o. %<N%> -> %<Adv%> || .#. {hiç}|{bugün}|{hergün} _ .#.

        .o. %<N%> -> %<Adj%> || .#.  n2j _ .#. 
        .o. %<N%> -> %<Adj%> %<%0%> %<N%>|| .#.  n2j _ 


        .o. %<Adv%> -> %<Cnj%:adv%> || .#. {böylece}|{bile}|{peki}|{hele}|{dolayısıyla}|{nitekim} _ 
        .o. %<Adv%> -> %<Adv%:qst%>  || .#. {nasıl}|{niye}|{niçin} _
        .o. %<Adj%> -> %<Num%:qst%> || .#. {kaç} _

        .o. {boyunca} %<Postp%:adv%:nomC%> -> {boy} %<N%> %<p3s%> %<ca%> %<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>


        .o. %<Prn%:qst%> -> %<Prn%:qst%:pers%> || .#. {kim} _
        .o. %<Prn%:qst%> -> %<Prn%:qst%:pers%> || .#. {hangi} _
        .o. %<N%> -> %<Adj%> %<%0%> %<N%> || .#. {hangi} _
        .o. %<V%> %<part%:pres%> %<Adj%> %<%0%> %<N%> -> %<V%> %<vn%:pres%> %<N%>
        .o. s [e|a] l %<Adj%> -> %<N%> %<sal%> %<Adj%>
        .o. %<%0%> %<N%> -> 0 || %<N%:prop%> _ 
        .o. %<%0%> %<V%> -> %<%0%> %<V%> %<cpl%:pres%> || 
                [%<Exist%>|%<Exist%:neg%>] _ %<3s%> .#.
        .o. %<Exist%:neg%> -> %<Adj%> || y o k _ %<%0%> %<N%>
        ;


regex o2t.i;
save stack o2t.fst
